Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.130

Award of fees.

(1) In any action to enforce this chapter, the court may allow the prevailing plaintiff or plaintiffs, other than the state or political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorneys' fees, all nonattorney fee costs as defined by RCW 4.84.010, and all reasonable expert witness fees, including all such reasonable fees and costs incurred before filing the action.

(2)(a) A prevailing plaintiff does not need to achieve relief or favorable judgment if the plaintiff demonstrates that they succeeded in altering the political subdivision's behavior to correct a claimed harm.

(b) For purposes of this section, "altering the political subdivision's behavior" includes, but is not limited to, adopting a new method of electing a governing body, modifying district boundaries, or amending a voting rule or qualification.

(3) Prevailing defendants may recover an award of fees or costs pursuant to RCW 4.84.185.

[ 2023 c 56 s 10; 2018 c 113 s 405.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.